Washington statutes.
RCW 4.08.030

Either spouse or either domestic partner may sue for community—Necessary parties.

Either spouse or either domestic partner may sue on behalf of the community: PROVIDED, That

(1) When the action is for personal injuries, the spouse or the domestic partner having sustained personal injuries is a necessary party;

(2) When the action is for compensation for services rendered, the spouse or the domestic partner having rendered the services is a necessary party.

[ 2008 c 6 s 407; 1972 ex.s. c 108 s 1; Code 1881 s 6; 1877 p 4 s 6; 1875 p 4 s 2; 1869 p 4 s 6; 1854 p 131 s 5; RRS s 181.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.